lt-LT: Žymėjimo patvarumas: Nuolatinis; Pusiau nuolatinis; Laikinas; Kita
ko: 마킹 내구성: 영구적; 반영구적; 일시적; 기타
it: Durata della marcatura: Permanente; Semipermanente; Temporaneo; Altro
fi: Merkinnän kestävyys: Pysyvä; Puolipysyvä; Väliaikainen; Muu
sk-SK: Trvanlivosť značenia: Trvalé; Polotrvalé; Dočasné; Iná
th: ความทนทานของการทำเครื่องหมาย: ถาวร; กึ่งถาวร; ชั่วคราว; อื่นๆ
vi: Độ bền đánh dấu: Vĩnh viễn; Bán vĩnh viễn; Tạm thời; Khác
cs: Trvanlivost značení: Trvalé; Polotrvalé; Dočasné; Jiné
pt-BR: Marcação durabilidade: Permanente; Semipermanente; Temporário; Outro
zh-CN: 标记耐久性: 永久; 半永久; 临时; 其他
ru: Долговечность маркировки: Перманентный; Полуперманентный; Временный; Другое
es: Durabilidad del marcado: Permanente; Semipermanente; Temporal; Otro
pl: Trwałość oznakowania: Trwałe; Półtrwałe; Tymczasowe; Inne
fr: Durabilité du marquage: Permanent; Semi-permanent; Temporaire; Autre
bg-BG: Издръжливост на маркировката: Перманентно; Полуперманентно; Временно; Друго
hr-HR: Trajnost označavanja: Trajno; Polutrajno; Privremeno; Ostalo
de: Haltbarkeit der Markierung: Dauerhaft; Semi-permanent; Temporär; Sonstiges
tr: İşaretleme dayanıklılığı: Kalıcı; Yarı kalıcı; Geçici; Diğer
zh-TW: 標線耐久性: 永久; 半永久; 暫時; 其他
sl-SI: Obstojnost oznake (talne označbe): Trajno; Poltrajno; Začasno; Drugo
nb: Markeringens holdbarhet: Permanent; Semipermanent; Midlertidig; Annet
da: Holdbarhed af opmærkning: Permanent; Semipermanent; Midlertidig; Andet
en: Marking durability: Permanent; Semi-permanent; Temporary; Other
hu: Jelölés tartóssága: Permanens; Féltartós; Ideiglenes; Egyéb
ro-RO: Durabilitatea marcajului: Permanentă; Semipermanentă; Temporară; Altele
ja: マーキングの耐久性: 永久; 半永久; 一時的; その他
nl: Markering duurzaamheid: Permanent; Semi-permanent; Tijdelijk; Overige
pt-PT: Durabilidade da marcação: Permanente; Semipermanente; Temporário; Outro
el: Ανθεκτικότητα σήμανσης: Μόνιμο; Ημιμόνιμο; Προσωρινό; Άλλο
sv: Märkningshållbarhet: Permanent; Semipermanent; Tillfällig; Annat